Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 1.
“HOLFORD” BONDS (CONST., ART. 20 ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment added Ark. Const., Art. 20, and is incorporated into the original Constitution. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly on January 30, 1883 (see Acts 1883, p. 346), was declared adopted by the Speaker of the House on January 14, 1885, and was so proclaimed by the Governor. The vote for the amendment was 119,806 and the vote against the amendment was 15,492.